test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_A_mashkimod_gt-glossing.yaml
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodensmibniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodensmibniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: gmashkmodenymibniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenymibniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenymibniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: gmashkmodensmibniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodensmibniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodensmibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: mashkmodenymibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenymibniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenymibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: mashkmodensmibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensmibniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensmibniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: mashkmodenymibniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenymibniing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenymibniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: mashkmodensmibniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensmibniing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensmibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmashkmodenyshinaanba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodenyshinaandig
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmashkmodensshinaanba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodensshinaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodenyshinaanba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodenyshinaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodenyshiwaaba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodenyshiwaadig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodensshinaanba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodensshinaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodensshiwaaba
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodensshiwaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: mashkmodenyshiwaaba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenyshiwaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt: mashkmodenyshinwiba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: mashkmodenyshinwidig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: mashkmodensshiwaaba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: mashkmodensshiwaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt: mashkmodensshinwiba
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: mashkmodensshinwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmashkmodenyshinaanin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmashkmodenyshinaaning
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmashkmodenyshinaanin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmashkmodensshinaanin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmashkmodensshinaaning
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmashkmodensshinaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmashkmodenyshinaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodenyshinaaning
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodenyshinaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmashkmodenyshiwaan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodenyshiwaang
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodenyshiwaan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmashkmodensshinaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodensshinaaning
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodensshinaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmashkmodensshiwaan
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodensshiwaang
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodensshiwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: mashkmodenyshiwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: mashkmodenyshiwaang
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: mashkmodenyshiwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+4: mashkmodenyshinwan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Loc: mashkmodenyshiniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Pl: mashkmodenyshinwan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: mashkmodensshiwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: mashkmodensshiwaang
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: mashkmodensshiwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+4: mashkmodensshinwan
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Loc: mashkmodensshiniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Pl: mashkmodensshinwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: nmashkmodenyshibniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodenyshibniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodenyshibniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: nmashkmodensshibniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodensshibniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodensshibniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gmashkmodenyshibniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenyshibniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenyshibniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gmashkmodensshibniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodensshibniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodensshibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: mashkmodenyshibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenyshibniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenyshibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: mashkmodensshibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensshibniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensshibniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: mashkmodenyshibniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenyshibniing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenyshibniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: mashkmodensshibniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensshibniing
     X+mshkimot+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensshibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmashkmodenynaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodenynaanbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodenynaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmashkmodensnaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodensnaanbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodensnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodenynaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenynaanbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenynaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodenywaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenywaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenywaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodensnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodensnaanbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodensnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodenswaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodenswaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodenswaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: mashkmodenywaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenywaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenywaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+4: mashkmodenyniwbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenyniwbaniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenyniwbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: mashkmodenswaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mashkmodenswaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: mashkmodenswaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: mashkmodensniwbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: mashkmodensniwbaniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Pl: mashkmodensniwbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmashkmodaamshinaanba
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodaamshinaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodaamshinaanba
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodaamshinaandig
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmashkmodaamshiwaaba
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmashkmodaamshiwaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: mashkmodaamshiwaaba
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaamshiwaadig
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: mashkmodaamshinwiba
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: mashkmodaamshinwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmashkmodaamshinaanin
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmashkmodaamshinaaning
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmashkmodaamshinaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmashkmodaamshinaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodaamshinaaning
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodaamshinaanin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmashkmodaamshiwaan
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmashkmodaamshiwaang
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmashkmodaamshiwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: mashkmodaamshiwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: mashkmodaamshiwaang
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: mashkmodaamshiwaan
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: mashkmodaamshinwan
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: mashkmodaamshiniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Pl: mashkmodaamshinwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmashkmodaamshibniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodaamshibniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodaamshibniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmashkmodaamshibniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodaamshibniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodaamshibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mashkmodaamshibniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkmodaamshibniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkmodaamshibniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: mashkmodaamshibniin
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: mashkmodaamshibniing
     X+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: mashkmodaamshibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmashkmodaamnaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodaamnaanbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodaamnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodaamnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodaamnaanbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodaamnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodaamwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodaamwaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodaamwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: mashkmodaamwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mashkmodaamwaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: mashkmodaamwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: mashkmodaamniwbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: mashkmodaamniwbaniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Pl: mashkmodaamniwbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mshkimot+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmashkmodaashnaanbaniin
     1+mshkimot+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmashkmodaashnaanbaniing
     1+mshkimot+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmashkmodaashnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodaashnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodaashnaanbaniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodaashnaanbaniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmashkmodaashwaabniin
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmashkmodaashwaabniing
     2+mshkimot+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmashkmodaashwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: mashkmodaashwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: mashkmodaashwaabniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: mashkmodaashwaabniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: mashkmodaashniwbaniin
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: mashkmodaashniwbaniing
     3+mshkimot+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: mashkmodaashniwbaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmashkmodenymishnaanba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodenymishnaandig
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmashkmodensmishnaanba
     1+mshkimot+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmashkmodensmishnaandig
